Hawaii statutes.
[PART V.
RENEWABLE PORTFOLIO STANDARDS]

§269-91 [Definitions.] For the
purposes of this [part]:

"Biofuels" means liquid or gaseous
fuels produced from organic sources such as biomass crops, agricultural
residues and oil crops, such as palm oil, canola oil, soybean oil, waste
cooking oil, grease, and food wastes, animal residues and wastes, and sewage
and landfill wastes.

"Cost-effective" means the ability to
produce or purchase electric energy or firm capacity, or both, from renewable
energy resources at or below avoided costs or as the commission otherwise
determines to be just and reasonable consistent with the methodology set by the
public utilities commission in accordance with section 269-27.2.

"Electric utility company" means a
public utility as defined under section 269-1, for the production, conveyance,
transmission, delivery, or furnishing of power.

"Renewable electrical energy" means:

(1) Electrical energy generated using renewable
energy as the source, and beginning January 1, 2015, includes customer-sited,
grid-connected renewable energy generation; and

(2) Electrical energy savings brought about by:

(A) The use of renewable displacement or
off-set technologies, including solar water heating, sea-water air-conditioning
district cooling systems, solar air-conditioning, and customer-sited,
grid-connected renewable energy systems; provided that, beginning January 1,
2015, electrical energy savings shall not include customer-sited,
grid-connected renewable-energy systems; or

(B) The use of energy efficiency
technologies, including heat pump water heating, ice storage, ratepayer-funded
energy efficiency programs, and use of rejected heat from co-generation and
combined heat and power systems, excluding fossil-fueled qualifying facilities that
sell electricity to electric utility companies and central station power
projects.

"Renewable energy" means energy
generated or produced using the following sources:

(1) Wind;

(2) The sun;

(3) Falling water;

(4) Biogas, including landfill and sewage-based
digester gas;

(5) Geothermal;

(6) Ocean water, currents, and waves, including ocean
thermal energy conversion;

(7) Biomass, including biomass crops, agricultural
and animal residues and wastes, and municipal solid waste and other solid
waste;

(8) Biofuels; and

(9) Hydrogen produced from renewable energy
sources.

"Renewable portfolio standard" means
the percentage of electrical energy sales that is represented by renewable
electrical energy. [L 2001, c 272, §2; am L 2004, c 95, §4; am L 2006, c 162, §4;
am L 2009, c 50, §3 and c 155, §2; am L 2011, c 10, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next